test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-xob_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - хоба: # Noun 'fur' - full paradigm /Type 19/
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom: хоба
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc: хобамʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen: хобаʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat: хобанʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc: хобахана
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl: хобахад
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros: хобавна
     хоба+N+Du+Nom: хобахаʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Acc: хобахаʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Gen: хобахаʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom: хобаˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc: хоб
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen: хобˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat: хобахаˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc: хобахаˮна
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl: хобахат
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros: хобˮмана
     
# Possessive forms 
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: хобав 
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: хобар  
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: хобада 
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: хобамиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: хобариʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: хобадиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: хобаваˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: хобараˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: хобадоʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [хобав, хобами] 
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: хобамд  
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: хобамда 
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: хобамиʼ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: хобамдиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: хобамдиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: хобаваˮ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: хобамдаˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: хобамдоʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [хобан, хобани]
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: хобанд  
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: хобанда 
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: хобаниʼ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: хобандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: хобандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: хобанаˮ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: хобандаˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: хобандоʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [хобахан, хобахани]
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: хобаханд  
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: хобаханда 
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: хобаханиʼ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: хобахандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: хобахандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: хобаханаˮ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: хобахандаˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: хобахандоʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: хобаханан 
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: хобахананд  
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: хобахананда 
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: хобахананиʼ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: хобаханандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: хобаханандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: хобахананаˮ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: хобаханандаˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: хобаханандоʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: хобахадан 
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: хобахаданд  
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: хобахаданда 
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: хобахаданиʼ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: хобахадандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: хобахадандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: хобахаданаˮ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: хобахадандаˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: хобахадандоʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хобавнан   
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: хобавнани  
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: хобавнанд  
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: хобавнанда 
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: хобавнаниʼ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: хобавнандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: хобавнандиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: хобавнанаˮ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: хобавнандаˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: хобавнандоʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: хобахаюн  
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: хобахаюд  
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: хобахаюда 
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: хобахаюниʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: хобахаюдиʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: хобахаюдиʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: хобахаюнаˮ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: хобахаюдаˮ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: хобахаюдоʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: хобахаюн  
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: хобахаюд  
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: хобахаюда 
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: хобахаюниʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: хобахаюдиʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: хобахаюдиʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: хобахаюнаˮ
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: хобахаюдаˮ
     хоба+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: хобахаюдоʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: хобахаюн  
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: хобахают  
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: хобахаюта 
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: хобахаюниʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: хобахаютиʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: хобахаютиʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: хобахаюнаˮ
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: хобахаютаˮ
     хоба+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: хобахаютоʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: хобан   
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: хобад   
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: хобда  
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: хобниʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: хобдиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: хобдиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: хобнаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: хобдаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: хобдоʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: хобан   
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: хобад   
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: хобда  
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: хобниʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: хобдиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: хобдиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: хобнаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: хобдаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: хобдоʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: хобаˮн  
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: хобат   
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: хобта  
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: хобˮниʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: хобтиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: хобтиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: хобˮнаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: хобтаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: хобтоʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: хобахаˮн 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: хобахат 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: хобахата 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: хобахаˮниʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: хобахатиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: хобахатиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: хобахаˮнаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: хобахатаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: хобахатоʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: хобахаˮнан  
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: хобахаˮнат  
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: хобахаˮната 
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: хобахаˮнаниʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: хобахаˮнатиʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: хобахаˮнатиʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: хобахаˮнанаˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: хобахаˮнатаˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: хобахаˮнатоʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: хобахатан 
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: хобахатат 
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: хобахатата 
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: хобахатаниʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: хобахататиʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: хобахататиʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: хобахатанаˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: хобахататаˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: хобахататоʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: хобˮманан  
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: хобˮманат  
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: хобˮманата 
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: хобˮмананиʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: хобˮманатиʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: хобˮманатиʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: хобˮмананаˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: хобˮманатаˮ
     хоба+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: хобˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative
     хоба+N+Pred+Abs: хобад
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: хобадав 
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: хобадар  
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: хобадада
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: хобадав
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: хобадамд
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: хобадамда
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: хобадан
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: хобаданд
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: хобаданда
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: хобадамиʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: хобадариʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: хобададиʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: хобадамиʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: хобадамдиʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: хобадамдиʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: хобаданиʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: хобадандиʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: хобадандиʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: хобадаваˮ
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: хобадараˮ
     хоба+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: хобададоʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: хобадаваˮ
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: хобадамдаˮ
     хоба+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: хобадамдоʼ
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: хобаданаˮ
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: хобадандаˮ
     хоба+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: хобадандоʼ
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: [хобадмʼ, хобамʼ]
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: хобан  
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: хоба   
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: хобаниʼ
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: хобадиʼ
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: хобахаʼ
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: хобаваˮ
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: хобадаˮ
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: хобаˮ  
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: [хобадамзь, хобаманзь]
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: хобанась 
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: хобась   
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: хобанинзь
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: хобадинзь
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: хобаханзь
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: хобаваць 
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: хобадаць 
     хоба+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: хобаць   
                    
# Predicative Possessive forms 

     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобав 
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобар  
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобада 
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобамиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобариʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобадиʼ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобаваˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобараˮ
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg: хобадоʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюн  
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюд  
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюда 
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюниʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюдиʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюдиʼ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюнаˮ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюдаˮ
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu: хобахаюдоʼ
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобан   
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобад   
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобда  
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобниʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобдиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобдиʼ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобнаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобдаˮ 
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl: хобдоʼ 
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобавась
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобарась
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобадась
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобаминзь
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобаринзь
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобадинзь
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобаваць
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобараць
     хоба+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg: хобадонзь
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюнась
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюдась
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюдась
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюнинзь
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюдинзь
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюдинзь
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюнаць
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюдаць
     хоба+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu: хобахаюдонзь
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобнась
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобдась
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобдась
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобнинзь
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобдинзь
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобдинзь
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобнаць
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобдаць
     хоба+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl: хобдонзь
     
     хоба+N+Tra: хобаӈэ
     хоба+N+Car: хобасиˮ
     хоба+N+Equ: хобадаремʼ
     хоба+N+Equ+Lat: хобадаревʼ
